Maryland, session 2025, HB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–601.
(a) Subject to subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, the Department has jurisdiction
over and full police authority for the enforcement STATEWIDE of the criminal laws and the
parking and motor vehicle laws as to the operation, maintenance, and protection of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1485*

HOUSE BILL 1485
(1) [buildings and grounds that, on June 30, 1984, were administered by
the Office of Annapolis Public Buildings and Grounds, and extending to the surrounding
area that encompasses 1,000 feet in any direction from the boundary of those buildings and
grounds;
(2) buildings and grounds that, on June 30, 1984, were administered by the
Office of Baltimore Public Buildings and Grounds, and extending to the surrounding area
that encompasses 1,000 feet in any direction from the boundary of those buildings and
grounds;
(3) multiservice centers designated by law or by the Board of Public Works
and extending to the surrounding area that encompasses 1,000 feet in any direction from
the boundary of those multiservice centers;
(4) buildings and grounds that, on June 30, 2019, were administered by the
Maryland Department of Labor, and extending to the surrounding area that encompasses
1,000 feet in any direction from the boundary of those buildings;
(5)] State–owned or State–leased buildings and grounds and extending to
the surrounding area that encompasses [1,000] 2,000 feet in any direction from the
boundary of those buildings and grounds; and
[(6)] (2) other public improvements or grounds designated by law or by
the Board of Public Works.
(b) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND IN
ADDITION TO THE POWERS GRANTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A
POLICE OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND CAPITOL POLICE WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT
MAY INVESTIGATE AND ENFORCE STATEWIDE THE CRIMINAL LAWS AND TITLE 12 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(2) IF A POLICE OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND CAPITOL POLICE
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT EXERCISES THE POWERS GRANTED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, NOTIFICATION OF THE INVESTIGATION AND
ENFORCEMENT SHALL BE PROVIDED AS SOON AS POSSIBLE:
(I) IN A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, TO THE CHIEF OF POLICE
OR DESIGNEE OF THE CHIEF OF POLICE;
(II) IN A COUNTY WITH A COUNTY POLICE DEPARTMENT, TO THE
CHIEF OF POLICE OR DESIGNEE OF THE CHIEF OF POLICE;
(III) IN A COUNTY WITHOUT A POLICE DEPARTMENT, TO THE
SHERIFF OR DESIGNEE OF THE SHERIFF; AND

HOUSE BILL 1485 3
(IV) IN BALTIMORE CITY, TO THE POLICE COMMISSIONER OR
DESIGNEE OF THE POLICE COMMISSIONER.
(C) Consistent with Article 8 of the Maryland Declaration of Rights, with respect
to State legislative buildings in the City of Annapolis, the presiding officers of the General
Assembly shall have final authority over the use of and access to the buildings by the
members of the General Assembly, their staff, and Department of Legislative Services
personnel.
4–605.
(a) (1) In accordance with the provisions of the State Personnel and Pensions
Article, the Secretary may establish a police and security force, known as the Maryland
Capitol Police of the Department of General Services, to protect people and property on or
about improvements, grounds, and multiservice centers under the jurisdiction of the
Department, and in the surrounding areas of the buildings and grounds in the State as
described in § 4–601 of this subtitle.
(2) (i) The Secretary shall appoint the Chief of the Maryland Capitol
Police of the Department of General Services.
(ii) The Chief of the Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of
General Services serves at the pleasure of the Secretary.
(iii) The Chief of the Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of
General Services shall supervise and direct the affairs and operations of the Maryland
Capitol Police.
(3) The Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of General Services
may include sworn police officers.
(b) A member of the Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of General
Services may not be involuntarily transferred from a site to another site.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a Maryland Capitol Police officer has
all the powers granted to a peace officer and a police officer of the State.
(d) A Maryland Capitol Police officer may exercise the powers described in
subsection (c) of this section within the Department’s jurisdiction as specified in § 4–601 of
this subtitle provided the police officer:
(1) meets the legal requirements set forth by the Maryland Police Training
and Standards Commission; and
(2) is designated by the Department as a police officer.

HOUSE BILL 1485
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.